Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DRINKING WATER CONTAMINATE MITIGATION PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Contractor" means a Minnesota licensed water conditioning contractor or Minnesota licensed plumbing contractor. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible water treatment system" means a system installed by a contractor that complies with Minnesota Plumbing Code, 611.0 Water Conditioning Equipment. new text end new text begin (d) "Impacted area" means an area determined by the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to have or likely have a water source where the level of manganese in the water exceeds the health-based guidance for manganese developed by the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (e) "Rebate" means a rebate up to $1,400 regardless of the size or cost of the work performed or system installed. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rebate program. new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must establish a program to provide rebates to contractors that install eligible water treatment systems in residential buildings that reduce known or emerging contaminants in drinking water from impacted areas. Under the program, the commissioner must require that: new text end new text begin (1) rebate applications include specifications about the water treatment system being installed; new text end new text begin (2) contractors certify that the water treatment system will be installed in a manner that complies with this section and the requirements under subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (3) both the owner or lessee of the property and the contractor sign a rebate application; new text end new text begin (4) rebates are sent to the contractor; and new text end new text begin (5) contractors receive ten percent up front from the owner or lessee and the contractors are responsible for submitting rebate applications. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin To be eligible for a rebate under this section, the contractor must certify that: new text end new text begin (1) the owner or lessee of the residential building has a household income of $95,000 or less; and new text end new text begin (2) the residential building is within an impacted area. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DRINKING WATER CONTAMINATE MITIGATION PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to issue rebates under the drinking water contaminate mitigation program established under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end